Hawaii statutes.
[§325-115] Program oversight
committee. The director shall appoint a sterile needle exchange program
oversight committee to provide assistance and advice in the oversight of the
program. The committee shall meet periodically with the director to monitor
the progress and effectiveness of the program and to examine available data
compiled by the program. [L 1992, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next